Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3216
Private foundations and split-interest trusts; governing instrument; amendments permitted.

The trustee of a trust, whenever created, which is a private foundation or a split-interest trust as defined in sections 509 and 4947, respectively, of the Internal Revenue Code may, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the governing instrument or under any other law of this state and except as otherwise provided by court decree entered after April 30, 1971, amend the terms of the governing instrument to the extent necessary to bring the trust into conformity with the requirements for:

(1) Termination of private foundation status in the manner described in section 507 of such code, and exemption of the trust from the taxes imposed by sections 4941 to 4945, inclusive, thereof; or

(2) Exclusion of the trust from private foundation status under section 509(a)(3) of such code; and to this end may release any power contained in the governing instrument, may reduce or limit the charitable organizations or classes of charitable organizations in whose favor a power to select may be exercised, and may appoint new or additional trustees. If the trust is for the benefit of one or more named charitable organizations, the trustee shall first obtain the consent of those organizations before making any amendment under this subdivision.

Laws 1971, LB 793, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-635;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 41.